fi: Katon korkeusluokka: Korkea katto; Matala katto; Keskikorkea katto; Nostokatto; Korotettu katto (jälkiasennus); Muu
nl: Dakhoogteklasse: Hoog dak; Laag dak; Middelhoog dak; Hefdak; Verhoogd dak (aftermarket); Overige
pl: Klasa wysokości zadaszenia: Wysoki dach; Niski dach; Średni dach; Dach podnoszony (pop-top); Dach podwyższany (modyfikacja); Inny
ja: ルーフ高さクラス: ハイルーフ; ロールーフ; ミドルルーフ; ポップアップルーフ; レイズドルーフ (アフターマーケット); その他
el: Κατηγορία ύψους οροφής: Ψηλή οροφή; Χαμηλή οροφή; Μεσαία οροφή; Ανοιγόμενη οροφή (pop-top); Υπερυψωμένη οροφή (aftermarket); Άλλο
tr: Tavan yükseklik sınıfı: Yüksek tavan; Alçak tavan; Orta tavan; Açılır tavan; Yükseltilmiş tavan (satış sonrası); Diğer
th: ระดับความสูงของหลังคา: หลังคาสูง; หลังคาเตี้ย; หลังคาระดับกลาง; หลังคาป๊อปท็อป; หลังคายกสูง (ตกแต่งเพิ่มเติม); อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Stogo aukščio klasė: Aukštas stogas; Žemas stogas; Vidutinis stogas; Pakeliamasis stogas; Paaukštintas stogas (modifikuotas); Kita
vi: Nhóm chiều cao trần xe: Mui cao; Mui thấp; Mui trung; Mui bật; Mui nâng (độ thêm); Khác
zh-CN: 车顶高度等级: 高顶; 低顶; 中顶; 弹出式车顶; 加高车顶（售后）; 其他
ro-RO: Clasă de înălțime a plafonului auto: Plafon înalt; Plafon jos; Plafon mediu; Plafon pop-top; Plafon înălțat (aftermarket); Altele
cs: Třída výšky střechy: Vysoká střecha; Nízká střecha; Střední střecha; Zvedací střecha; Zvýšená střecha (dodatečná úprava); Jiné
ru: Класс высоты крыши: Высокая крыша; Низкая крыша; Средняя крыша; Подъемная крыша; Увеличенная крыша (модификация); Другое
nb: Høydeklasse for tak: Høyt tak; Lavt tak; Middels høyt tak; Hevetak; Forhøyet tak (ettermarked); Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta zavore za kotalke: Visoka streha; Nizka streha; Srednje visoka streha; Dvižna streha; Povišana streha (naknadno vgrajena); Drugo
da: Højdeklasse for tag: Højt tag; Lavt tag; Mellemhøjt tag; Pop op-tag; Hævet tag (eftermarked); Andet
bg-BG: Клас на височината на покрива: Висок покрив; Нисък покрив; Среден покрив; Повдигащ се покрив; Повдигнат покрив (допълнително монтиран); Друго
pt-PT: Classe de altura do tejadilho: Tejadilho alto; Tejadilho baixo; Tejadilho médio; Tejadilho elevável; Tejadilho elevado (pós-venda); Outro
pt-BR: Teto, categoria de altura: Teto alto; Teto baixo; Teto médio; Teto pop-up; Teto elevado (acessório); Outro
hr-HR: Klasa visine krova: Visoki krov; Niski krov; Srednje visoki krov; Podizni krov; Naknadno povišeni krov; Ostalo
fr: Classe de hauteur de toit: Toit surélevé; Toit bas; Toit moyen; Toit relevable; Toit surélevé (après-vente); Autre
zh-TW: 屋頂高度等級: 高車頂; 低車頂; 中車頂; 上掀式車頂; 加高車頂 (售後市場); 其他
sk-SK: Trieda výšky strechy: Vysoká strecha; Nízka strecha; Stredná strecha; Výklopná strecha; Zvýšená strecha (dodatočná montáž); Iné
de: Dachtypen: Hochdach; Flachdach; Mittelhohes Dach; Aufstelldach; Erhöhtes Dach (Nachrüstung); Sonstige
it: Classe di altezza del tetto: Tetto alto; Tetto basso; Tetto medio; Tetto a soffietto; Tetto rialzato (aftermarket); Altro
hu: Tetőmagasság kategóriája: Magastető; Alacsony tető; Középmagas tető; Felnyitható tető; Magasított tető (utólagos); Egyéb
en: Roof height class: High roof; Low roof; Mid roof; Pop-top; Raised roof (aftermarket); Other
sv: Takhöjdsklass: Högt tak; Lågt tak; Medelhögt tak; Uppfällbart tak; Förhöjt tak (eftermarknad); Övrigt
ko: 루프 높이 등급: 하이 루프; 로우 루프; 미드 루프; 팝톱; 레이즈드 루프(애프터마켓); 기타
es: Clase de altura del techo: Techo alto; Techo bajo; Techo medio; Techo elevable; Techo elevado (posventa); Otro